Extension/de_DFEW.aff
# de_DFEW.aff - DFEW affix file for use in hunspell
#
# DFEW is an abbreviation of Deutsches Fachspezifisches Ergänzungswörterbuch, 
# a German supplementary dictionary containing mostly scientific/technical terms 
# that are not present in Franz Michael Baumann's de-DE-frami dictionary.
#
# Copyright (C) 2009-2022 Vladyslav Shtabovenko
#
# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwäüößESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWÄÜÖ
LANG de_DE
NOSUGGEST O
CIRCUMFIX X

SFX F Y 2
SFX F 0 n e
SFX F 0 en [^e]

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 ns .

SFX Y Y 42
SFX Y 0 meter .
SFX Y 0 meters .
SFX Y 0 gramm .
SFX Y 0 sekunde .
SFX Y 0 sekunden .
SFX Y 0 ampere .
SFX Y 0 kelvin .
SFX Y 0 mol .
SFX Y 0 candela .
SFX Y 0 hertz .
SFX Y 0 newton .
SFX Y 0 pascal .
SFX Y 0 joule .
SFX Y 0 watt .
SFX Y 0 coulomb .
SFX Y 0 volt .
SFX Y 0 farad .
SFX Y 0 ohm .
SFX Y 0 siemens .
SFX Y 0 weber .
SFX Y 0 tesla .
SFX Y 0 henry .
SFX Y 0 lumen .
SFX Y 0 lux .
SFX Y 0 becquerel .
SFX Y 0 gray .
SFX Y 0 sievert .
SFX Y 0 katal .
SFX Y 0 elektronenvolt .
SFX Y 0 elektronvolt .
SFX Y 0 newtonmeter .
SFX Y 0 ampersekunde .
SFX Y 0 voltsekunde .
SFX Y 0 amperestunde .
SFX Y 0 voltampere .
SFX Y 0 newtonsekunde .
SFX Y 0 wattsekunde .
SFX Y 0 wattstunde .
SFX Y 0 pond .
SFX Y 0 parsec .
SFX Y 0 bar .
SFX Y 0 curie .

SFX V Y 16
SFX V en e en
SFX V en st [^ntßsxz]en
SFX V en t [^ntßsxz]en
SFX V en t [ßsxz]en
SFX V en est [t]en
SFX V en et [t]en
SFX V en st [^h]nen
SFX V en t [^h]nen
SFX V en est hnen
SFX V en et  hnen
SFX V eln ele eln
SFX V eln elt eln
SFX V eln elst eln
SFX V ern ere ern
SFX V ern ert ern
SFX V ern erst ern


SFX y Y 29
SFX y 0 m .
SFX y 0 g .
SFX y 0 s .
SFX y 0 A .
SFX y 0 K .
SFX y 0 mol .
SFX y 0 cd .
SFX y 0 Hz .
SFX y 0 N .
SFX y 0 Pa .
SFX y 0 J .
SFX y 0 W .
SFX y 0 C .
SFX y 0 V .
SFX y 0 F .
SFX y 0 S .
SFX y 0 Wb .
SFX y 0 T .
SFX y 0 H .
SFX y 0 Lm .
SFX y 0 Lx .
SFX y 0 Bq .
SFX y 0 Gy .
SFX y 0 Sv .
SFX y 0 kat .
SFX y 0 eV .
SFX y 0 p .
SFX y 0 rad .
SFX y 0 rem .


SFX A Y 9
SFX A 0 es [^e]
SFX A 0 er [^e]
SFX A 0 e [^e]
SFX A 0 en [^e]
SFX A 0 em [^e]
SFX A 0 r e
SFX A 0 s e
SFX A 0 n e
SFX A 0 m e

SFX a Y 5
SFX a el le el
SFX a el ler el
SFX a el les el
SFX a el lem el
SFX a el len el

SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 s [^ßsxz]

SFX g Y 1
SFX g 0 es .

SFX m Y 1
SFX m 0 ses nis

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 n .

SFX S Y 2
SFX S 0 e .
SFX S 0 en .

SFX C Y 34
SFX C 0 ion .
SFX C 0 ione .
SFX C 0 ions .
SFX C 0 ionen .
SFX C 0 atom .
SFX C 0 atoms .
SFX C 0 atome .
SFX C 0 atomen .
SFX C 0 kern .
SFX C 0 kerns .
SFX C 0 kerne .
SFX C 0 kernen .
SFX C 0 isotop .
SFX C 0 isotops .
SFX C 0 isotope .
SFX C 0 isotopen .
SFX C 0 verbindung .
SFX C 0 verbindungen .
SFX C 0 legierung .
SFX C 0 legierungen .
SFX C 0 spektrum .
SFX C 0 spektrums .
SFX C 0 spektren .
SFX C 0 linie .
SFX C 0 linien .
SFX C 0 zerfall .
SFX C 0 zerfälle 
SFX C 0 zerfällen 
SFX C 0 zerfalls .
SFX C 0 zerfalles .
SFX C 0 gehalts .
SFX C 0 gehalt .
SFX C 0 konzentration .
SFX C 0 konzentrationen .


SFX H Y 165
SFX H 0 ien [^n]al
SFX H 0 ien zip
SFX H 0 se nis
SFX H 0 sen nis
SFX H a ata a
SFX H ab äbe ab
SFX H ab äben ab
SFX H aben äben aben
SFX H ach ächer ach
SFX H ach ächern ach
SFX H achs ächse achs 
SFX H achs ächse achs 
SFX H acht ächte acht
SFX H acht ächten acht
SFX H ad äder ad
SFX H ad ädern ad
SFX H aden äden aden
SFX H afen äfen afen
SFX H aft äfte aft
SFX H aft äften aft
SFX H ag äge ag
SFX H ag ägen ag
SFX H ahl ähle ahl
SFX H ahl ählen ahl
SFX H ahn ähne ahn
SFX H ahn ähnen ahn
SFX H aht ähte aht
SFX H aht ähten aht
SFX H ald älder ald
SFX H ald äldern ald
SFX H all älle fall
SFX H all ällen fall
SFX H als älse als
SFX H als älsen als
SFX H amm ämme amm
SFX H amm ämmen amm
SFX H ammer ämmer ammer
SFX H ammer ämmern ammer
SFX H ampf ämpfe ampf
SFX H ampf ämpfen ampf
SFX H an äne an
SFX H an änen an
SFX H anal anäle anal
SFX H anal anälen anal
SFX H and ände [^rb]and
SFX H and änden [^rb]and
SFX H and änder [rb]and
SFX H ang änge ang
SFX H ang ängen ang
SFX H ank änke ank
SFX H ank änken ank
SFX H antel äntel antel
SFX H antel änteln antel
SFX H apf äpfe apf
SFX H apf äpfen apf
SFX H arm ärme arm
SFX H arm ärmen arm
SFX H as äser as
SFX H as äsern as
SFX H ass ässer ass
SFX H ass ässern ass
SFX H ast äste ast
SFX H ast ästen ast
SFX H asten ästen asten
SFX H att ätter [^t]att
SFX H att ättern [^t]att
SFX H att ätten tatt
SFX H atz ätze atz
SFX H atz ätze atz
SFX H atz ätzen atz
SFX H atz ätzen atz
SFX H auch äuche auch
SFX H auch äuche auch
SFX H auf äufe auf
SFX H auf äufen auf
SFX H auf aufs auf
SFX H aul äule aul
SFX H aul äulen aul
SFX H aum äume aum
SFX H aum äumen aum
SFX H aut äute aut
SFX H aut äuten aut
SFX H buch bücher buch
SFX H buch büchern buch
SFX H en ina umen
SFX H ex ices ex
SFX H ex izes ex
SFX H haus häuser haus
SFX H haus häusern haus
SFX H is en is
SFX H is en sis
SFX H modus modi modus
SFX H och öcher och
SFX H och öchern och
SFX H ock öcke ock
SFX H ock öcken ock
SFX H oden öden oden
SFX H of öfe of
SFX H of öfen of
SFX H ofen öfen ofen
SFX H og öge og
SFX H og ögen og
SFX H ogen ögen ogen
SFX H olf ölfe olf
SFX H olf ölfen olf
SFX H olz ölzer olz
SFX H olz ölzern olz
SFX H om öme om
SFX H om ömen om
SFX H on öne on
SFX H on önen on
SFX H opf öpfe opf
SFX H opf öpfen opf
SFX H orb örbe orb
SFX H orb örben orb
SFX H orn örner orn
SFX H orn örnern orn
SFX H oß öße öß
SFX H oß öße stoß
SFX H oß ößen öß
SFX H oß ößen stoß
SFX H oss össer oss
SFX H oss össern oss
SFX H otz ötze otz
SFX H otz ötzen otz
SFX H ruch rüche ruch
SFX H ruch rüchen ruch
SFX H statt stätten statt
SFX H ub übe ub
SFX H ub üben ub
SFX H uchs üchsen uchs
SFX H uchs üchsen uchs
SFX H uck ücke uck
SFX H uck ücken uck
SFX H ug üge ug
SFX H ug ügen ug
SFX H uhl ühle uhl
SFX H uhl ühlen uhl
SFX H um en [^a]um
SFX H umpf ümpfe umpf
SFX H umpf ümpfen umpf
SFX H und ünde und
SFX H und ünden und
SFX H ung ünge ung
SFX H ung üngen ung
SFX H unst ünste unst
SFX H unst ünsten unst
SFX H ur üre ur
SFX H ur üren ur
SFX H urf ürfe urf
SFX H urf ürfen urf
SFX H urm ürme urm
SFX H urm ürmen urm
SFX H us en [^h]us
SFX H uss üsse uss
SFX H uß üße uß
SFX H uss üssen uss
SFX H uß üßen uß
SFX H ut üter [^a]ut
SFX H ut ütern [^a]ut
SFX H wort wörter wort
SFX H wort wörtern wort
SFX H x zen trix
SFX H zaun zäune zaun
SFX H zaun zäunen zaun


SFX M Y 4
SFX M um a um
SFX M en a en
SFX M a en a
SFX M o en o

SFX R Y 3
SFX R 0 er [^e]
SFX R 0 r e
SFX R 0 ern .

SFX P Y 11
SFX P 0 sch/KX .
SFX P 0 sches/KX .
SFX P 0 scher/KX .
SFX P 0 sche/KX .
SFX P 0 schen/KX .
SFX P 0 schem/KX .
SFX P 0 'sches/KX .
SFX P 0 'scher/KX .
SFX P 0 'sche/KX .
SFX P 0 'schen/KX .
SFX P 0 'schem/KX .

PFX K Y 29
PFX K A a/X A
PFX K Ä ä/X Ä
PFX K B b/X B
PFX K C c/X C
PFX K D d/X D
PFX K E e/X E
PFX K F f/X F
PFX K G g/X G
PFX K H h/X H
PFX K I i/X I
PFX K J j/X J
PFX K K k/X K
PFX K L l/X L
PFX K M m/X M
PFX K N n/X N
PFX K O o/X O
PFX K Ö ö/X Ö
PFX K P p/X P
PFX K Q q/X Q
PFX K R r/X R
PFX K S s/X S
PFX K T t/X T
PFX K U u/X U
PFX K Ü ü/X Ü
PFX K V v/X V
PFX K W w/X W
PFX K X x/X X
PFX K Y y/X Y
PFX K Z z/X Z

KEY qwertzuiopü|asdfghjklöä|yxcvbnm|qaw|say|wse|dsx|sy|edr|fdc|dx|rft|gfv|fc|tgz|hgb|gv|zhu|jhn|hb|ujmi|kjm|jn|iko|lkm|olp|pöü|äö

REP 23
REP ä a
REP a ä
REP o ö
REP ö o
REP u ü
REP ü u
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP s '
REP ' s
REP ss ß
REP ß ss
REP kt x
REP x kt
REP x chs
REP chs x
REP ff fff
REP i ie
REP ie i
REP d t
REP t d
REP th t
REP t th
