Extension/de_DFEW.dic
abschopfen/V
Ammoniumperchlorat/GS
Analogiegedanke/nF
anpasten/V
Anzeigemanometer/GN
atemgesteuert/A
Atmosphärenverhältnis/mH
Audioproduktionshaus/gH
Auffängerstrom/GgH
Aufmaß/gS
aufquellen/V
Aufwindkraftwerk/GgS
Ausheizung/F
Außenwinkelhalbierende/RF
Banachalgebra/GM
Bändchenfaser/N
Bärlappsame/nF
bebunkern/V
Beer/GP
Benzamid/GgS
Berkelium/CG
Biegedauerbruch/GgH
bilderzeugend/A
Binsenstuhl/GgH
bivariabel/a
Braunkohlekraftwerk/GgS
Breitbandseismometer/GN
Breit/GP
Brennweitenverhältnis/mH
Calcium/CG
Chemotherapeutikum/GM
Chilesalpeter/GN
Codierungsvariante/RF
Colladon/GP
Crimphülse/F
c/yO
da/yO
Deka/Y
Deponieschacht/GgH
Deuterium/CG
Dezi/Y
dibbeln/V
Dichtematrix/H
Diopsit/GS
dipolfrei/A
Dipolmagnetfeld/GgR
Diquarkonium/GM
Dispergierungsmittel/GN
Dispersionsverhältnis/mH
divisibel/a
Drahthaspel/N
Druckgießen/GP
Durchbruchspunkt/GgS
d/yO
Eggenfeld/GgR
Einfarbigkeit/F
Einfurchenpflug/GgH
Einschaltfunke/nF
einspuren/V
eisengrau/A
Enthalpieminimum/GM
entsanden/V
Evakuierungsraum/GgH
Exa/Y
explosibel/a
Extrusionsdruck/GgH
E/yO
Fallengrundzustand/GgH
Faltungsbegriff/GgS
feldspathaltig/A
Femto/Y
Ferritübertrager/GN
Ferroelektrikum/GM
Flankenübertragung/F
Fluor/CG
Fokussierungsfeld/GgR
Franzband/GgHS
Frehse/GP
Funkendurchbruch/GgH
f/yO
gefasert/A
Gemischverhältnis/mH
gerätekompatibel/a
Gesamtmassenträgheitsmoment/GgS
Giga/Y
Gleitfunke/nF
Graustufenskala/GM
Gravastern/GgS
Griffmutter/N
Grundlastfall/GgH
Gruson/GP
G/yO
halbkontinuierlich/A
Hallfeld/GgR
Handelsreisendenproblem/GS
Handschälung/F
hardwarekompatibel/a
Hauptfunke/nF
Hekto/Y
Helium/CG
herausdiffundieren/V
hineinblicken/V
Hopkinson/GP
hydrometrisch/A
h/yO
ignorabel/a
indivisibel/a
inkommensurabel/a
Inspektionsgang/GgH
Interaktionspunkt/GgS
Interpolationsschema/GHM
invariabel/a
Inzidenzverhältnis/mH
Iterationsschema/GHM
Kapillaraszension/F
Katapultsitz/gS
kaustifizieren/V
Kavitationstunnel/GN
Kilo/Y
Koeffizientenverhältnis/mH
Koerzitivfeld/GgR
Kohlenstoff/CG
Kommutatoralgebra/GM
Kondensatorzwischenraum/GgH
Konen/GP
kontraktibel/a
Kraftstoffdampf/GgH
Kühlerschutz/g
Kurbelschere/F
k/yO
Lagerungsverhältnis/mH
lärmoptimierte/A
Laugungsmittel/GN
Liealgebra/GM
Lie/GP
Lizardit/GS
Magnetpulververfahren/G
Mangan/CG
Maschenbild/GgR
Mega/Y
Membranereignis/mH
Mikro/Y
Milli/Y
Milton/GP
Mineralfasermatte/F
Modellierungsansatz/gH
Mosaikschirm/GgS
m/yO
M/yO
Nachgedanke/nF
Nachkühler/GN
nachstemmen/V
Nahfeld/GgRyl
Nano/Y
Natriumaluminat/GS
nebelbedingt/A
Neel/GP
Neuheitserfordernis/mH
nichtreversibel/a
Nickel/CG
Noniusskala/GM
Normalenfeld/GgR
n/yO
Paarquersumme/F
Parapositronium/GM
Peclet/GP
Peta/Y
Piko/Y
Planetenproblem/GS
Plasmaschmelzofen/GH
Plattformwagen/G
Polonium/CG
Polynomanteil/GgS
positionsbestimmend/A
Potentialmaximum/GM
Potenzialfeld/GgR
Pressluftnagler/GN
programmkompatibel/a
Pulseinhüllende/F
Pumpverhältnis/mH
p/yO
P/yO
Quasikontinuum/GM
Rauschenbach/GP
rechnerkompatibel/a
Refraktionsergebnis/mH
Registraturschrank/GgH
Relativanteil/GgS
resolvieren/V
Resonanzfeld/GgR
Restklassenalgebra/GM
Retourdampf/GgH
Rhodium/CG
Ruckelerscheinung/F
Rückführfeder/N
Rücksetzknopf/GgH
Schamotteerzeugnis/mH
schnellverderblich/A
Schöner/GP
Schottblech/GgS
Schwefel/CG
Sektorenringlicht/GgR
Servoverstärker/GN
Siebband/GgHS
Silizid/GgS
Silogebläse/GF
Sondengerät/GgS
Starterbetrieb/GgS
steckerkompatibel/a
Steigungsverhältnis/mH
Stützfunke/nF
Submillimeterwelle/F
Substratträger/GN
Subtrahierglied/GgR
Summationsindex/H
supranuklear/A
Swan/GP
Tantal/CG
Teeranstrich/GgS
Tera/Y
tiefdunkel/a
Titancarbid/GgS
Torusmantel/GH
Transformationsgedanke/nF
Transformationsschema/GHM
Transformatorübersetzungsverhältnis/mH
Traufbrett/GgR
Tritium/CG
Umflechtung/F
umherschieben/V
Unterbrecherfunke/nF
unverspannten/A
Vanadium/CG
Varmeter/GN
Vereinheitlichungsgedanke/nF
Verkokungsraum/GgH
Vernetzungsgedanke/nF
Verriegelungskreis/gS
verstiften/V
Vinylacetat/GS
Wecktopf/GgH
Wegeverhältnis/mH
Wegner/GP
Weißlicht/GgR
Weitwinkelaufnahme/F
Yotta/Y
y/yO
Zepto/Y
Zinn/CG
Zuheizer/GN
Zündfunke/nF
zurückstreuen/V
zweitleichtest/A
z/yO
